Missouri, session 2026, HB2359.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 304, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 304.262, to read as follows:
304.262. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be referred to
as "Felicity's Law".
2. Every ice cream truck shall be equipped with the following safety devices:
(1) Front passenger side-mounted wide-angle convex mirror;
(2) Reverse backup alarm capable of emitting a sound that is audible above
surrounding noise level;
(3) Rear-mounted mirror, obstacle detection sensor, or camera to provide rear
visibility for the operator; and
(4) Front-mounted obstacle detection system capable of detecting obstacles
within three feet of the vehicles's front bumper or a four-foot crossing arm that remains
extended during parked operations and is only retracted immediately prior to the
operator shifting the vehicle into the drive position.
3. The safety equipment required under subsection 2 of this section shall be
utilized whenever a motor vehicle is engaged in operation as an ice cream truck.
4. In addition to the safety equipment required under subsection 2 of this
section, every ice cream truck shall have signage visible from the rear of the vehicle, a
minimum of one square foot in size, stating either "Caution" or "Watch for Children".
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2359 2
5. For purposes of this section, "ice cream truck" means any motorized motor
vehicle from which ice cream, frozen milk, frozen dairy, or other frozen ice confection
products are sold or offered for sale in a ready-to-eat form and customarily consumed at
point of sale.
✔